Arkansas, session 2025, HB1145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-22-106(17)(B), concerning purchases
exempt from soliciting bids in a county, is amended to read as follows:
(B) The purchase amount for a new motor vehicle may
include additional after-market equipment that was not available under the
state contract up to one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) two thousand
dollars ($2,000) over the fleet price awarded;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-58-104(17)(B), concerning purchases
exempt from soliciting bids in a municipality, is amended to read as follows:
(B) The purchase amount for a new motor vehicle may
include additional options up to six hundred dollars ($600) two thousand
dollars ($2,000) over the fleet price awarded;
*SSS062*
02-12-2025 14:06:44 SSS062

As Engrossed: S2/12/25 HB1145

/s/Wooten


































02-12-2025 14:06:44 SSS062